Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 2
MUNICIPAL HOME RULE

Cross references:

For home rule cities and towns, see article XX of the state constitution; for home rule counties, see article 35 of title 30.

31-2-201. Short title.

This part 2 shall be known and may be cited as the "Municipal Home Rule Act of 1971".

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1013, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-2-101 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-2-202. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly declares that the policies and procedures contained in this part 2 are enacted to implement section 9 of article XX of the state constitution, adopted at the 1970 general election, by providing statutory procedures to facilitate adoption and amendment of municipal home rule charters, and, to this end, this part 2 shall be liberally construed. The provisions of this part 2 shall supersede the requirements of article XX of the state constitution, as they relate to procedures for the initial adoption of home rule charters and for the amendment of existing home rule charters, as provided in section 9 (3) of article XX of the state constitution.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1013, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 1191, § 88, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-2-102 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-2-203. Definitions.

As used in this part 2, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Ballot title" means a ballot title as defined in section 31-11-103 (1).

"Publication" means one publication in one newspaper of general circulation within the municipality. If there is no such newspaper, publication shall be by posting in at least three public places within the municipality.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1014, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 791, § 4, effective August 2.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-1-103 (2) as it existed prior to 1975.

31-2-204. Initiation of home rule.

Proceedings to adopt a home rule charter for a municipality may be initiated:

By the submission of a petition, signed by at least five percent of the registered electors of the municipality, to the governing body thereof; or

By the adoption of an ordinance by the governing body of the municipality, without the prior submission of a petition therefor.

Within thirty days after the initiation of the proceedings, in accordance with either paragraph (a) or (b) of subsection (1) of this section, the governing body of the municipality shall call an election for the purpose of forming a charter commission and of electing members thereof to frame a charter for the municipality, which election shall be held within one hundred twenty days after the date of the call of the election. The governing body shall cause notice of the election to be published not less than sixty days prior to the election.

Candidates for the charter commission shall be nominated by filing with the clerk, on forms supplied by the clerk, a nomination petition signed by at least twenty-five registered electors and a statement by the candidate of consent to serve if elected. Said petition and statement shall be filed within thirty days after publication of the election notice. A second notice of the election, as soon as possible after the completion of filings, shall be published by the governing body and shall include the names of candidates for the charter commission.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1014, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 84:

(1)(a) amended, p. 831, § 1, effective April 25.

L. 85:

(1)(a) amended, p. 1346, § 13, effective April 30.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-2-104 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-2-205. Election on formation of charter commission and designation of members.

At the election voters shall cast ballots for or against forming the charter commission. If a majority of the registered electors voting thereon vote for forming the charter commission, a commission to frame a charter shall be deemed formed.

At the election voters shall also cast ballots for electing the requisite number of charter commission members. Those candidates receiving the highest number of votes shall be elected. In the event of tie votes for the last available vacancy, the clerk shall determine by lot the person who shall be elected.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1014, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-2-105 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-2-206. Charter commission.

The charter commission shall be comprised as follows:

In municipalities having a population of less than two thousand, nine members; and

In municipalities having a population of at least two thousand, nine members unless the initiating ordinance or petition establishes a higher odd-number of members not to exceed twenty-one members.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 94, p. 1191, § 89, effective July 1, 1994.)

If the petition or ordinance initiating home rule proceedings pursuant to section 31-2-204 (1) or initiating proceedings for forming a new charter commission pursuant to section 31-2-210 (2) specifies that the members of the charter commission shall be elected by and from single- or multi-member districts or by a combination of such districts and at-large representation, the governing body, prior to publishing the notice provided for in section 31-2-204 (2) or 31-2-210 (4), shall divide the municipality into compact districts of approximately equal population. In such event the members of said charter commission shall be elected by and from districts, or partly by and from districts and partly at large, as specified in said petition or ordinance.

Eligibility to serve on the charter commission shall extend to all registered electors of the municipality. Any vacancy on the charter commission shall be filled by appointment of the governing body.

The charter commission shall meet at a time and date set by the governing body, which shall be not more than twenty days subsequent to the certification of the election, for the purpose of organizing itself. At such meeting, the commission members shall elect a chairman, a secretary, and such other officers as they deem necessary, all of which officers shall be members of the commission. The commission may adopt rules of procedure for its operations and proceedings. A majority of the commission members shall constitute a quorum for transacting business. Further meetings of the commission shall be held upon call of the chairman or a majority of the members. All meetings shall be open to the public.

The commission may employ a staff; consult and retain experts; and purchase, lease, or otherwise provide for such supplies, materials, and equipment as it deems necessary. Upon completion of its work, the commission shall be dissolved, and all property of the commission shall become the property of the municipality.

The governing body may accept funds, grants, gifts, and services for the commission from the state of Colorado, or the United States government, or any agencies or departments thereof, or from any other public or private source.

Reasonable expenses of the charter commission shall be paid out of the general funds of the municipality, upon written verification made by the commission chairman and secretary, and the governing body shall adopt such supplemental appropriation ordinances as may be necessary to support such expenditures. Members of the commission shall receive no compensation but may be reimbursed for actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties.

The charter commission may conduct interviews and make investigations in the preparation of a charter, and, to the fullest extent practicable, municipal officials and employees shall cooperate with the commission by providing information, advice, and assistance.

The charter commission shall hold at least one public hearing in preparation of a proposed charter.

Within one hundred eighty days after its election, the charter commission shall submit to the governing body a proposed charter.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1014, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 81:

(1)(b) amended and (1)(c) added, p. 1491, § 7, effective June 5.

L. 94:

(1) amended, p. 1191, § 89, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(2) amended, (SB 09-292), ch. 369, p. 1977, § 106, effective August 5.

L. 2011:

(4) and (10) amended, (HB 11-1122), ch. 63, p. 164, § 1, effective September 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-2-106 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-2-207. Charter election - notice.

Within thirty days after the date that the charter commission submits the proposed charter to it, the governing body shall publish and give notice of an election to determine whether the proposed charter shall be approved, which election shall be held not less than sixty nor more than one hundred eighty-five days after publication of the notice thereof. Such notice of the election shall contain the full text of the proposed charter.

(1.5) The governing body shall set the ballot title for the proposed charter within sixty days after the date that the proposed charter is submitted pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.

If a majority of the registered electors voting thereon vote to adopt the proposed charter, the charter shall be deemed approved and it shall become effective at such time as the charter provides.

If a majority of the registered electors voting thereon vote to reject the proposed charter, the charter commission shall proceed to prepare a revised proposed charter, utilizing the procedures set forth in section 31-2-206, and the governing body shall submit the revised proposed charter to an election in the manner set forth in subsection (1) of this section. If a majority of the registered electors voting on such revised proposed charter vote to adopt the revised proposed charter, it shall be deemed approved and it shall become effective at such time as the revised charter provides. If a majority of the registered voters voting thereon vote to reject the revised proposed charter, the charter commission shall forthwith be dissolved.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1016, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

(1.5) added, p. 791, § 5, effective August 2.

L. 2011:

(1) amended, (HB 11-1122), ch. 63, p. 164, § 2, effective September 1.

L. 2015:

(1) amended, (HB 15-1130), ch. 230, p. 854, § 4, effective August 5.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-2-107 as it existed prior to 1975.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 15-1130, see section 1 of chapter 230, Session Laws of Colorado 2015.

31-2-208. Filings - effect.

Within twenty days after its approval, a certified copy of the charter shall be filed with the secretary of state and with the clerk.

Upon such filings all courts shall take judicial notice of the charter.

This section shall also apply to any amendment or repeal of a charter.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1016, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-2-108 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-2-209. Special procedure for adopting a charter upon incorporation.

Proceedings to adopt a home rule charter may be initiated at the time of incorporation.

In order to initiate home rule at the time of incorporation, the petition for incorporation shall be in the form and meet the requirements required by the provisions of section 31-2-101, except that:

The petition shall be signed by at least five percent of the registered electors of the territory to be embraced within the boundaries of the proposed municipality, notwithstanding any provision of section 31-2-101; and

The petition for incorporation shall request the initiation of proceedings for the adoption of a home rule charter pursuant to the provisions of this part 2.

The election commissioners appointed by the court pursuant to section 31-2-102 shall exercise, to the extent practicable, the powers, functions, and responsibilities otherwise assigned by this part 2 to the governing body or clerk, and the procedures for incorporation and adoption of a home rule charter shall be modified as necessary to effectuate concurrent consideration.

At the incorporation election, conducted under the provisions of section 31-2-102, the registered electors shall vote upon:

The question of incorporation, as set forth in section 31-2-102 (5);

The question of whether a charter commission should be formed, as set forth in section 31-2-205 (1); and

The election of charter commission members, as set forth in section 31-2-205 (2).

If a majority of the registered electors voting thereon vote for incorporation and for formation of a charter commission, the first election of officers shall be stayed pending drafting and approval of the charter pursuant to sections 31-2-206 and 31-2-207. Upon ratification of the charter or after rejection of a charter and revised charter pursuant to section 31-2-207, the election commissioners shall proceed to the first election of officers and to completion of incorporation pursuant to part 1 of this article.

If a majority of the registered electors voting thereon vote for incorporation but against the formation of a charter commission, the procedures set forth in part 1 of this article shall be followed as if the petition for incorporation had not included a request for the adoption of home rule at the time of incorporation.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1016, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 84:

(2)(a) amended, p. 831, § 2, effective April 15.

L. 85:

(2)(a) amended, p. 1346, § 14, effective April 30.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-2-109 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-2-210. Procedure to amend or repeal charter.

Proceedings to amend a home rule charter may be initiated by either of the following methods:

Filing of a petition meeting the following requirements, in the following manner:

The petition process shall be commenced by filing with the clerk a statement of intent to circulate a petition, signed by at least five registered electors of the municipality. The petition shall be circulated for a period not to exceed ninety days from the date of filing of the statement of intent and shall be filed with the clerk before the close of business on the ninetieth day from said date of filing or on the next business day when said ninetieth day is a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday.

The petition shall contain the text of the proposed amendment and shall state whether the proposed amendment is sought to be submitted at the next regular election or at a special election. If the amendment is sought to be submitted at a special election, the petition shall state an approximate date for such special election, subject to the provisions of subparagraph (IV) of this paragraph (a) and subsection (4) of this section.

A petition to submit an amendment at the next regular election must be signed by at least five percent of the registered electors of the municipality registered on the date of filing the statement of intent and must be filed with the clerk at least ninety days prior to the date of said regular election.

A petition to submit an amendment at a special election must be signed by at least ten percent of the registered electors of the municipality registered on the date of filing the statement of intent and must be filed with the clerk at least ninety days prior to the approximate date of the special election stated in the petition.

An ordinance adopted by the governing body submitting the proposed amendment to a vote of the registered electors of the municipality. Such ordinance shall also adopt a ballot title for the proposed amendment.

Proceedings to repeal a home rule charter or to form a new charter commission may be initiated by either of the following methods:

Filing of a petition in the manner prescribed by, and meeting the requirements of, paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of this section; except that:

The petition shall state the proposal to repeal the charter or to form a new charter commission;

The petition must be signed by at least fifteen percent of the registered electors of the municipality, regardless of whether the petition seeks submission of the proposal at a regular or special election; and

If the proposal is for formation of a charter commission, the petition must be filed with the clerk at least ninety days prior to the date of the regular election or the approximate date stated in the petition for a special election, as the case may be.

An ordinance adopted by a two-thirds vote of the governing body submitting the proposed repeal or formation of a charter commission to a vote of the registered electors of the municipality.

The clerk shall, within fifteen working days after the filing of a petition pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of this section or paragraph (a) of subsection (2) of this section, certify to the governing body as to the validity and sufficiency of such petition. If the petition is sufficient, the governing body shall set a ballot title for the proposed amendment at its next meeting. If the petition is declared insufficient, such petition may be withdrawn by a majority of the persons representing the registered electors who signed such petition, may be amended or signed by additional registered electors of the municipality in accordance with paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of this section and paragraph (a) of subsection (2) of this section within fifteen days after such insufficiency is declared, and may be refiled as an original petition.

(3.5) If the subject matter of the petition is proposed for submission at a regular or special election that will be coordinated by the county clerk pursuant to section 1-7-116, C.R.S., and the municipal clerk has certified to the governing body that the petition is valid and sufficient, the clerk shall certify the proposed ballot question to the county clerk and recorder sixty days prior to the coordinated election as provided in section 1-5-203 (3), C.R.S., unless the petition has by the sixtieth day been determined to be insufficient pursuant to section 31-2-223. Should the petition be found to be insufficient pursuant to section 31-2-223 following certification to the county clerk and recorder, the election on such question shall be deemed canceled, and any votes cast on the question shall not be counted.

The governing body shall, within thirty days of the date of adoption of the ordinance or the date of filing of the petition (if the same is certified by the clerk to be valid and sufficient), publish notice of an election upon the amendment or proposal, which notice shall contain the full text of the amendment or statement of the proposal as contained in the ordinance or petition. The election shall be held not less than sixty nor more than one hundred twenty days after publication of such notice; except that, if the proposal is for formation of a charter commission, the election shall be held not less than sixty days after publication of such notice. If the amendment or proposal is initiated by petition and is sought to be submitted at a special election, the election shall be held as near as possible to the approximate date stated in the petition, but in any event shall be held within the time limits stated in this subsection (4).

The procedure for the forming and functioning of a new charter commission shall comply as nearly as practicable with sections 31-2-204 to 31-2-207, relating to formation and functioning of an initial charter commission.

If a majority of the registered electors voting thereon vote for a proposed amendment, the amendment shall be deemed approved. If a majority of the registered electors voting thereon vote for repeal of the charter, the charter shall be deemed repealed and the municipality shall proceed to organize and operate pursuant to the statutes applicable to a municipality of its size.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1017, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 79:

Entire section R&RE, p. 1170, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 85:

(1)(a)(I), (1)(a)(II), (1)(a)(IV), and (2)(a)(II) amended, p. 1346, § 15, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(1)(a)(III) and (1)(a)(IV) amended and (3.5) added, p. 1767, § 61, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

(1)(b) and (3) amended, p. 791, § 6, effective August 2.

L. 2007:

(3.5) amended, p. 2046, § 84, effective June 1.

L. 2015:

(4) amended, (HB 15-1130), ch. 230, p. 855, § 5, effective August 5.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-2-110 as it existed prior to 1975.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 15-1130, see section 1 of chapter 230, Session Laws of Colorado 2015.

31-2-211. Elections - general.

Except as otherwise specifically provided, all elections held pursuant to this part 2 shall be conducted as nearly as practicable in conformity with the provisions of the "Colorado Municipal Election Code of 1965".

All necessary expenses for elections conducted pursuant to this part 2 for existing municipalities or for municipalities incorporated pursuant to part 1 of this article shall be paid out of the treasury of the municipality.

A special election shall be called for any election held pursuant to this part 2 when a regular election is not scheduled within the time period provided for such election.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1017, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-2-111 as it existed prior to 1975.

Cross references:

For the "Colorado Municipal Election Code of 1965", see article 10 of this title.

31-2-212. Initiative, referendum, and recall.

Every charter shall contain procedures for the initiative and referendum of measures and for the recall of officers.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1018, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-2-112 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-2-213. Determination of population.

When a determination of the population or number of registered electors of the municipality is required under this part 2, said determination shall be made upon the best readily available information by the governing body, clerk, election commissioners, or court, as the case may be. Such determination shall be final in the absence of fraud or gross abuse of discretion.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1018, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 84:

Entire section amended, p. 831, § 3, effective April 25.

L. 85:

Entire section amended, p. 1346, § 16, effective April 30.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-2-113 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-2-214. Time limit on submission of similar proposals.

No proposal for a charter commission, charter amendment, or repeal of a charter shall be initiated within twelve months after rejection of a substantially similar proposal.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1018, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-2-114 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-2-215. Conflicting or alternative charter proposals.

In submitting any charter or charter amendment, any alternative provision may be submitted for the choice of the voters and may be voted on separately without prejudice to others. The alternative provision receiving the highest number of votes, if approved by a majority of the registered electors voting thereon, shall be deemed approved.

In case of adoption of conflicting provisions which are not submitted as alternatives, the one which receives the greatest number of affirmative votes shall prevail in all particulars as to which there is conflict.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1018, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 84:

Entire section amended, p. 832, § 4, effective April 25.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-2-115 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-2-216. Change in classification of municipalities.

Notwithstanding the provisions of part 2 of article 1 of this title, a town having a population exceeding two thousand may reclassify itself as a city, and a city having a population of two thousand or less may reclassify itself as a town, upon adoption of a home rule charter without otherwise complying with the procedures in said part 2.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1018, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 81:

Entire section amended, p. 1491, § 8, effective June 5.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-2-116 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-2-217. Vested rights saved.

The adoption of any charter, charter amendment, or repeal thereof shall not be construed to destroy any property right, contract right, or right of action of any nature or kind, civil or criminal, vested in or against the municipality under and by virtue of any provision of law theretofore existing or otherwise accruing to the municipality; but all such rights shall vest in and inure to the municipality or to any persons asserting any such claims against the municipality as fully and as completely as though the charter, amendment, or repeal thereof had not been adopted. Such adoption shall never be construed to affect any such right existing between the municipality and any person.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1018, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-2-117 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-2-218. Finality.

No proceeding contesting the adoption of a charter, charter amendment, or repeal thereof shall be brought unless commenced within forty-five days after the election adopting the measure.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1018, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-2-118 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-2-219. Additional petition requirements.

Any petition to initiate the adoption, amendment, or repeal of a municipal home rule charter, including the formation of a new charter commission, shall be subject to the provisions of sections 31-2-220 to 31-2-225, in addition to any other requirements imposed by this part 2. Any such petition which fails to conform to the requirements of this part 2 or is circulated in a manner other than that permitted in this part 2 is invalid.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire section added, p. 832, § 5, effective April 25.

31-2-220. Warning on petition - signatures - affidavits - circulators.

At the top of each page of a petition to initiate the adoption, amendment, or repeal of a municipal home rule charter, including the formation of a new charter commission, must be printed, in plain red letters no smaller than the impression of ten-point, bold-faced type, the following:

Any such petition shall be signed only by registered electors by their own signatures to which shall be attached the residence addresses of such persons, including street and number, if any, city or town, and the date of signing the same. To each such petition shall be attached an affidavit of the person who circulated the petition stating the affiant's address, that the affiant is eighteen years of age or older, that the affiant circulated the said petition, that each signature thereon was affixed in the affiant's presence, that each signature thereon is the signature of the person whose name it purports to be, that to the best of the knowledge and belief of the affiant each of the persons signing said petition was at the time of signing a registered elector, and that the affiant has not paid or will not in the future pay and that the affiant believes that no other person has so paid or will pay, directly or indirectly, any money or other thing of value to any signer for the purpose of inducing or causing such signer to affix the signer's signature to such petition. No petition shall be accepted for filing that does not have attached thereto the affidavit required by this section.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2000, p. 792, § 7, effective August 2, 2000.)

The clerk shall inspect timely filed petitions and attached affidavits to ensure compliance with subsection (2) of this section. Such inspection may consist of an examination of the information on the signature lines for patent defects, a comparison of the information on the signature lines with a list of registered electors provided by the county, or any other method of inspection reasonably expected to ensure compliance with subsection (2) of this section.

WARNING:
IT IS AGAINST THE LAW:

For anyone to sign any petition with any name other than his or her own or to knowingly sign his or her name more than once for the same measure or to sign such petition when not a registered elector.

DO NOT SIGN THIS PETITION UNLESS YOU ARE A
REGISTERED ELECTOR:

Do not sign this petition unless you have read or had read to you the text of the proposal in its entirety and understand its meaning.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire section added, p. 832, § 5, effective April 25.

L. 85:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 1347, § 17, effective April 30.

L. 92:

(1) amended, p. 2177, § 38, effective June 2.

L. 94:

(1) amended, p. 1772, § 37, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 96:

(2) amended, p. 1768, § 62, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

(2) and (3) amended and (4) added, p. 792, § 7, effective August 2.

L. 2013:

(1) amended, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 750, § 132, effective May 10.

L. 2014:

(1) amended, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 59, § 12, effective February 18.

Cross references:

(1) In 2013, subsection (1) was amended by the "Voter Access and Modernized Elections Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

(2) For the legislative declaration in HB 14-1164, see section 1 of chapter 2, Session Laws of Colorado 2014.

31-2-221. Form of petition - representatives of signers.

Petitions to initiate the adoption, amendment, or repeal of a home rule charter, including the formation of a new charter commission, shall be printed on pages eight and one-half inches wide by eleven inches long, with a margin of two inches at the top for binding; the sheets for signature shall have their ruled lines numbered consecutively and shall be attached to a complete copy of what is proposed, printed in plain block letters no smaller than the impression of eight-point type. Petitions may consist of any number of sections composed of sheets arranged as provided in this section. Each petition shall designate by name and address not less than three nor more than five registered electors who shall represent the signers thereof in all matters affecting the same. No such petition shall be printed, published, or otherwise circulated in a municipality until the clerk has approved it as to form only, and the clerk shall assure that the petition contains only the matters required by this part 2 and contains no extraneous material. The clerk shall approve or disapprove such form within five working days of submission. All such petitions shall be prenumbered serially, and the circulation of any petition described by this part 2 by any medium other than personally by a circulator is prohibited.

Any disassembly of the petition which has the effect of separating the affidavits from the signatures shall render the petition invalid and of no force and effect. Prior to the time of filing, the persons designated in the petition to represent the signers shall attach the sheets containing the signatures and affidavits together, which shall be bound in convenient volumes together with the sheets containing the signatures accompanying the same.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire section added, p. 833, § 5, effective April 25.

31-2-222. Ballot.

Proposals to adopt, amend, or repeal home rule charters, including the formation of a new charter commission, shall appear upon the official ballot by ballot title only and, if more than one, shall be numbered consecutively in such order as the governing body may provide and shall be printed on the official ballot in that order, together with their respective numbers prefixed in boldface type. Each ballot title shall appear once on the official ballot and shall be separated from the other ballot titles next to it by heavy black lines and shall be followed by the words "yes" and "no" as follows:

(HERE SHALL APPEAR THE
BALLOT TITLE IN FULL)

YES
NO

Source:

L. 84:

Entire section added, p. 834, § 5, effective April 25.

31-2-223. Affidavit - evidence - protest procedure.

All petitions to initiate the adoption, amendment, or repeal of a home rule charter, including the formation of a new charter commission, shall have attached thereto an affidavit of the circulator of the petition stating that each signature on the petition is the signature of the person whose name it purports to be and that to the best of the knowledge and belief of the affiant each of the persons signing such petition was at the time of signing a registered elector. A protest in writing, under oath, may be filed in the office in which such petition has been filed by some registered elector of the municipality or territory proposed to be incorporated within thirty days after such petition is filed, setting forth with particularity the grounds of such protest and the names protested. In such event the officer with whom such petition is filed shall mail a copy of the protest to the persons named in such petition as representing the signers thereof at the addresses therein given, together with a notice fixing a time for hearing the protest not less than five nor more than twenty days after such notice is mailed. If, at such hearing, such protest is denied in whole or in part, the person filing the same, within ten days after such denial, may file an amended protest, a copy of which shall be mailed to the persons named in the petition and on which a hearing shall be held as in the case of the original protest; but no person shall be entitled to amend an amended protest.

All records and hearings shall be public, and all testimony shall be under oath. The officer with whom such petition is filed shall have the power to issue subpoenas to compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of documents. Upon failure of any witness to obey the subpoena, the officer may petition the district court, and, upon proper showing, the court may enter an order compelling the witness to appear and testify or produce documentary evidence. Failure to obey the order of court shall be punishable as a contempt of court. Hearings shall be had as soon as is conveniently possible and must be concluded within thirty days after the commencement thereof, and the result of such hearings shall be certified to the persons representing the signers of such petition. In case the petition is declared insufficient in form or number of signatures of registered electors, it may be withdrawn by a majority in number of the persons representing the signers of such petition and, within fifteen days after the insufficiency is declared, may be amended or additional names signed thereto as in the first instance and refiled as an original petition. The finding as to the sufficiency of any petition may be reviewed by the district court of the county in which such petition is filed, but any such review shall be timely made, and, upon application, the decision of such court thereon shall be reviewed by the supreme court.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire section added, p. 834, § 5, effective April 25.

L. 85:

Entire section amended, p. 1348, § 18, effective April 30.

L. 2000:

(1) amended, p. 792, § 8, effective August 2.

31-2-224. Receiving money to circulate petition - penalty. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 84:

Entire section added, p. 835, § 5, effective April 25.

L. 89:

Entire section repealed, p. 861, § 156, effective July 1.

31-2-225. Unlawful acts - penalty.

With respect to any petition to initiate the adoption, amendment, or repeal of a home rule charter, including the formation of a new charter commission, it is unlawful:

For any person willfully and knowingly to circulate or cause to be circulated or sign or procure to be signed any petition bearing the name, device, or motto of any person, organization, association, league, or political party, or purporting in any way to be endorsed, approved, or submitted by any person, organization, association, league, or political party, without the written consent, approval, and authorization of such person, organization, association, league, or political party;

For any person to sign any name other than his own to any such petition or knowingly to sign his name more than once for the same measure at one election;

For any person to sign any such petition who is not a registered elector of the municipality or of the territory proposed to be incorporated at the time of signing the same;

For any person to sign any affidavit as circulator without knowing or reasonably believing the statements made in such affidavit to be true;

For any person to certify that an affidavit attached to such petition was subscribed or sworn to before him unless it was so subscribed and sworn to before him and unless such person so certifying is duly qualified under the laws of this state to administer an oath; or

For any person to do willfully any act in reviewing the petition or setting the ballot title which shall confuse or tend to confuse the issues submitted or proposed to be submitted at any election held under this part 2 or to refuse to submit any such petition in the form presented for submission at any election held under this part 2.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of this section commits a class 2 misdemeanor and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-501, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire section added, p. 835, § 5, effective April 25.

L. 85:

(1)(c) amended, p. 1349, § 19, effective April 30.

L. 2002:

(2) amended, p. 1543, § 289, effective October 1.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act amending subsection (2), see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.